Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4745
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-4745 to 71-4747:

(1) Communication means a two-way, interactive process to convey meaning from one person or group to another through the use of mutually understood signs, symbols, or voice;

(2) Credentialed teacher of the deaf means a certificated teacher with a special education endorsement in deaf or hard of hearing education;

(3) English means English literacy, spoken English, signing exact English and morphemic system of signs, conceptually accurate signed English, cued speech, and any other visual supplements;

(4) Language means a complex and dynamic system of conventional symbols that is used in various modes for thought and communication; and

(5) Literacy includes the developmental stages of literacy, which are necessary beginning stages to master a language and which include pre-emergent, emergent, and novice levels.

Laws 2020, LB965, § 4.